Connecticut, session 2026, SB00013.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to calculate the value of state
forest land, for purposes of grants in lieu of taxes payments by the state
to municipalities, as real property subject to the provisions of section 12-
64 of the general statutes for any municipality in which over fifty per
cent of the land within such municipality's boundaries is state forest.